Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Right to Dissent and Obtain Payment for Shares

§ 17-16-1301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Beneficial shareholder” means the person who is the beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf;

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered in W.S.

17-16-1322

through

17-16-1331

, includes the surviving entity in a merger;

Repealed By Laws 2009, Ch. 115, § 3.

“Fair value” means the value of the corporation’s shares determined:

Immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects;

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments to the articles pursuant to W.S 17-16-1302(a)(v).

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans, or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances;

“Record shareholder” means the person in whose names shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation;

“Shareholder” means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder;

“Affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior executive thereof;

“Beneficial owner” means any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote, or to direct the voting of, shares; except that a member of a national securities exchange is not deemed to be a beneficial owner of securities held directly or indirectly by it on behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of the securities if the member is precluded by the rules of the exchange from voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to be voted. When two (2) or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed thereby is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement, of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of the group;

“Preferred shares” means a class or series of shares whose holders have preference over any other class or series with respect to distributions.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “on the beneficial owner's behalf” for “as the record shareholder” in (a)(i); rewrote (a)(ii), which read: “‘Corporation’ means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter before the corporate action, or the surviving, new, or acquiring corporation by merger, consolidation, or share exchange of that issuer”; repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “‘Dissenter’ means a shareholder who is entitled to dissent from corporate action under
W.S.

17-16-1302

and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by
W.S.

17-16-1320

through
17-16-1328”; rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “‘Fair value,’ with respect to a dissenter's shares, means the value of the shares immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action unless exclusion would be inequitable”; and added (a)(viii) through (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The paragraphs in this section have been renumbered to more closely align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.
The two do not align completely as the numbering system of the Model Act is different from Wyoming Statutes under W.S.

8-1-105

, which is required by the 2009 law to be followed in the renumbering process.

Fair value. —

In determining the value of fractional shares of stock, a district court erred when it applied a 30 percent minority discount because the value of the shares should not have been adversely impacted by the mere fact of being a minority shareholder. A discount for trapped-in capital gains was also inappropriate because it was premised on an action contemplated by a corporation subsequent to a reverse stock split, and there was a lack of an evidentiary basis to calculate the discount when the nature, timing, and details were speculative; moreover, it was error to omit corporate assets from the calculation of fair value.
Brown v. Arp & Hammond Hardware Co., 2006 WY 107, 141 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2006).

Wyoming Supreme Court joins the majority of courts in holding, as a matter of law, that a minority discount may not be applied in determining the fair value of a dissenting shareholder's interest.
Brown v. Arp & Hammond Hardware Co., 2006 WY 107, 141 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

§ 17-16-1302.
Right to appraisal.

A shareholder is entitled to appraisal rights, and to obtain payment of the fair value of his shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a plan of merger or consolidation to which the corporation is a party if:

Shareholder approval is required for the merger or the consolidation by W.S.

17-16-1104

or

17-16-1111

and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger or consolidation, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger; or

The corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent under W.S.

17-16-1105

.

Consummation of a share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the exchange, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to any class or series of shares of the corporation that is not exchanged;

Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1202

if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the disposition;

An amendment of the articles of incorporation with respect to a class or series of shares that:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the shares;

Creates, alters or abolishes a right in respect of redemption, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase, of the shares;

Alters or abolishes a preemptive right of the holder of the shares to acquire shares or other securities;

Excludes or limits the right of the shares to vote on any matter, or to cumulate votes, other than a limitation by dilution through issuance of shares or other securities with similar voting rights; or

Reduces the number of shares of a class or series owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the corporation has the obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created.

Any other amendment to the articles of incorporation, merger, share exchange or disposition of assets if specifically provided in the articles of incorporation, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors;

Consummation of a transfer or domestication if the shareholder does not receive shares in the foreign corporation resulting from the transfer or domestication that have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material respects, and represent at least the same percentage interest of the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the corporation, as the shares held by the shareholder before the transfer or domestication;

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to nonprofit status; or

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to an unincorporated entity.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the availability of appraisal rights under paragraphs (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (vi) and (viii) of this section shall be limited in accordance with the following provisions:

Appraisal rights shall not be available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares which is:

A covered security under section 18(b)(1)(A) or (B) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended; or

Traded in an organized market and has at least two thousand (2,000) shareholders and a market value of at least twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00), exclusive of the value of such shares held by the corporation’s subsidiaries, senior executives, directors and beneficial shareholders owning more than ten percent (10%) of such shares; or

Issued by an open end management investment company registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940 and may be redeemed at the option of the holder at net asset value.

The applicability of paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be determined as of:

The record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of, and to vote at, the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action requiring appraisal rights; or

The day before the effective date of such corporate action if there is no meeting of shareholders.

Paragraph (i) of this subsection shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the holders of any class or series of shares who are required by the terms of the corporate action requiring appraisal rights to accept for such shares anything other than cash or shares of any class or any series of shares of any corporation, or any other proprietary interest of any other entity, that satisfies the standards set forth in paragraph (i) of this subsection at the time the corporate action becomes effective;

Reserved.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “appraisal rights” for “dissent from” in the introductory language of (a); in (a)(i)(A), deleted “or the articles of incorporation” after “17-16-1111,” and added “except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger”; in (a)(ii), deleted “plan of” after “Consummation of a,” and substituted “exchange, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to any class or series of shares of the corporation that is not exchanged” for “plan” at the end; rewrote (a)(iii), which read: “Consummation of a sale or exchange of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution, but not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one (1) year after the date of sale”; rewrote the introductory language of (a)(iv), which read: “An amendment of the articles of incorporation that materially and adversely affects rights in respect of a dissenter's shares because it”; rewrote (a)(iv)(E), which read: “Reduces the number of shares owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the fractional share so created is to be acquired for cash under W.S.

17-16-604

.”; repealed former (a)(v), which read: “Any corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote to the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares.”; added present (a)(v) and (a)(vi) through (viii); repealed former (b), which read: “A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for his shares under this article may not challenge the corporate action creating his entitlement unless the action is unlawful or fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the corporation.”; and added present (b).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Fair value. —

In determining the value of fractional shares of stock, a district court erred when it applied a 30 percent minority discount because the value of the shares should not have been adversely impacted by the mere fact of being a minority shareholder. A discount for trapped-in capital gains was also inappropriate because it was premised on an action contemplated by a corporation subsequent to a reverse stock split, and there was a lack of an evidentiary basis to calculate the discount when the nature, timing, and details were speculative; moreover, it was error to omit corporate assets from the calculation of fair value.
Brown v. Arp & Hammond Hardware Co., 2006 WY 107, 141 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

§ 17-16-1303.
Assertion of rights by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the record shareholder’s name but owned by a beneficial shareholder only if the record shareholder objects with respect to all shares of the class or series owned by the beneficial shareholder and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each beneficial shareholder on whose behalf appraisal rights are being asserted. The rights of a record shareholder who asserts appraisal rights for only part of the shares held of record in the record shareholder’s name under this subsection shall be determined as if the shares as to which the record shareholder objects and the record shareholder’s other shares were registered in the names of different record shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to shares of any class or series held on behalf of the shareholder only if the shareholder:

Submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the assertion of those rights not later than the date provided in W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(ii)(B); and

Does so with respect to all shares of the class or series that are beneficially owned by the beneficial shareholder.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) A record shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in his name only if he dissents with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one (1) person and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each person on whose behalf he asserts dissenters' rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection are determined as if the shares as to which he dissents and his other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

“(b) A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to shares held on his behalf only if:

“(i) He submits to the corporation the record shareholder's written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters' rights; and

“(ii) He does so with respect to all shares of which he is the beneficial shareholder or over which he has power to direct the vote.”